Hawaii statutes.
§94-1 Duties of department. The
department of accounting and general services shall collect all public
archives; preserve, arrange, describe, and inventory the same; provide for
their safekeeping; and compile and furnish information concerning them. The
department may adopt and use a seal and may adopt, amend, or revise from time
to time such rules and regulations as it may consider expedient for the conduct
of its business. [L 1905, c 24, §2; RL 1945, §31; am L 1945, c 238, §1; RL
1955, §13-5; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §12; HRS §94-1; am L 2013, c 88, §2]

Cross References

General authority of department, see §26-6.

Case Notes

Cited: 35 H. 608, 619.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next